Utah statutes.
63L-5-403.   Application to certain cases.

This chapter does not affect and is not intended to affect the authority of government entities to adopt or apply land use regulations that do not involve the free exercise of religion.



Renumbered and Amended by Chapter 382, 2008 General Session

